New Jersey, session 222, A192.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:39-5 or any other section of law to the contrary, a school district that enters into an agreement for the provision of school security services with an active or retired law enforcement officer, including a safe schools resource officer or a Class Three special law enforcement officer, or with a security officer registered under the provisions of the Security Officer Registration Act, P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-1 et seq.), shall not prohibit that officer from carrying a firearm in school buildings or on school grounds in the performance of his school security duties if that officer is authorized under State law to carry such firearm. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.